tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.dic
abaratar/IOPQRSTVWX
abeldar/PQSTVWX
abofetear/PQSTVWX
abordar/OPQRSTVX
abrigar/OPQRSTVWX
acaballerar/PQSTVWX
acamar/OPQRSTVWX
acaudalar/PQSTVWX
acechar/ILPQSTVWX
achiquitar/OPQRSTVWX
aclimatar/HOPQRSTVWX
acodillar/PQSTVWX
acompañar/ILNOPQRSTVWX
acoplar/IOPQRSTVWX
acosar/OPQRSTVX
acrecentar/IOPQRSTWX
acuñar/HPQSTVWX
aderezar/IPQSTVX
admirar/HOPQRSTVWX
adornar/ILOPQRSTVX
aducir/QTWX
advertir/INOQWYZ
afianzar/IOPQRSTVWX
afinar/HIOPQRSTVWX
afrentar/PQSTVX
agauchar/OPQRSTVWX
agolpar/IOPQRSTVWX
agregar/HOPQRSTVX
aguar/LOPQRSTWX
ahidalgar/OPQRSTVWX
ahorquillar/OPQRSTVWX
ajar/IOPQRSTVWX
albergar/OPQRSTVWX
alcoholizar/HOPQRSTVWX
alertar/OPQRSTVX
alimentar/HLOPQRSTVX
alternar/HLOPQRSTVX
amamantar/IPQSTVWX
amedrentar/OPQRSTVX
amojamar/IOPQRSTVWX
amortiguar/HIOPQRSTWX
amuermar/OPQRSTVWX
anexar/PQSTVWX
anonadar/HIOPQRSTVWX
aojar/PQSTVWX
aparejar/IOPQRSTVWX
apisonar/IPQSTVX
aplantillar/PQSTVWX
aportar/HOPQRSTVX
apremiar/LPQSTVX
aprisionar/PQSTVX
arborizar/HPQSTVWX
arraigar/NOPQRSTVWX
arrogar/HLOPQRSTVX
arruchar/PQSTVWX
artesonar/PQSTVX
asear/OPQRSTVWX
asestar/PQSTVX
asolear/OPQRSTVWX
atenuar/HLOPQRSTWX
atestar/HIOPQRSTVX
atontar/IOPQRSTVX
atraer/OQWY
atribular/HOPQRSTVWX
aturdir/IOQRTVWX
autenticar/HOPQRSTVWX
avanzar/OPQRSTVWX
aventurar/OPQRSTVWX
ayudar/LOPQRSTVWX
bailar/LPQSTVWX
baremar/PQSTVWX
bastionar/PQSTVX
birlar/PQSTVWX
bonificar/HPQSTVWX
botar/PQSTVWX
broncear/OPQRSTVWX
cabrear/OPQRSTVWX
calcar/PQSTVWX
canalizar/HPQSTVWX
cantar/LOPQRSTVWX
caramelear/PQSTVWX
caricaturizar/PQSTVWX
caseificar/HPQSTVWX
catalizar/PQSTVWX
cavar/PQSTVWX
celar/PQSTVX
centrifugar/HPQSTVX
cesar/HILOPQRSTVX
charquear/PQSTVWX
churrascar/PQSTVWX
cincelar/PQSTVX
circunstanciar/PQSTVX
clarear/OPQRSTVWX
clonar/HPQSTVX
cobijar/IOPQRSTVWX
codiciar/PQSTVX
colar/HOPQRSTWX
colonizar/HPQSTVWX
compaginar/HOPQRSTVWX
compilar/HOPQRSTVWX
concebir/IOQWY
concluir/OQWYZ
condonar/HLPQSTVX
conformar/HOPQRSTVWX
congelar/HIOPQRSTVX
congregar/HLOPQRSTVX
connaturalizar/HOPQRSTVWX
consentir/IOQWYZ
construir/OQWYZ
contemplar/HOPQRSTVWX
contingentar/PQSTVX
convidar/OPQRSTVWX
coproducir/QTVX
cornear/PQSTVWX
corregir/IOQWYZ
cotejar/PQSTVWX
criminar/HPQSTVWX
cruzar/IOPQRSTVWX
cuestionar/PQSTVX
cuotear/PQSTVWX
damnificar/PQSTVWX
decantar/HOPQRSTVWX
decorar/HPQSTVX
decuplicar/PQSTVWX
defoliar/HPQSTVX
delatar/OPQRSTVWX
delinear/HILPQSTVWX
demorar/OPQRSTVX
denostar/HPQSTWX
depositar/LOPQRSTVWX
derramar/IOPQRSTVWX
derrocar/IPQSTVX
desabollar/PQSTVX
desaceitar/PQSTVWX
desacorralar/PQSTVWX
desacuartelar/IPQSTVX
desairar/PQSTVWX
desamigar/OPQRSTVWX
desaojar/PQSTVWX
desarmar/OPQRSTVWX
desatar/OPQRSTVWX
desatrancar/PQSTVWX
desbordar/ILOPQRSTVX
descacharrar/LOPQRSTVWX
descangayar/OPQRSTVWX
descender/ILQTWX
desclavar/OPQRSTVWX
descolonizar/HPQSTVWX
desconcertar/LOPQRSTWX
desconocer/IQTWX
descremar/PQSTVWX
descuidar/NOPQRSTVWX
desembalar/PQSTVWX
desempaquetar/PQSTVX
desempolvar/OPQRSTVWX
desenclavar/PQSTVWX
desencuadernar/PQSTVX
desenfrenar/IOPQRSTVWX
desengañar/OPQRSTVWX
desenmascarar/OPQRSTVWX
desentumecer/IOQRTWX
desestancar/PQSTVWX
desfogar/OPQRSTVX
desgraciar/NOPQRSTVX
desheredar/HIOPQRSTVWX
desilusionar/OPQRSTVX
desinstalar/HPQSTVWX
desleír/OQRVWY
desmadrar/OPQRSTVWX
desmantelar/IPQSTVX
desmentir/QWY
desmontar/PQSTVX
desmugrar/PQSTVWX
desobstruir/QWY
desorbitar/OPQRSTVWX
despatillar/PQSTVWX
despeluchar/OPQRSTVWX
despertar/IOPQRSTWX
desplegar/OPQRSTWX
desposar/OPQRSTVX
desproteger/QTVWX
desquitar/OPQRSTVWX
destellar/PQSTVWX
destroncar/IPQSTVWX
desvincular/HOPQRSTVWX
devengar/OPQRSTVX
dignificar/HLOPQRSTVWX
disfrazar/OPQRSTVWX
disparar/OPQRSTVWX
divertir/IOQWY
dorar/OPQRSTVX
ecualizar/HPQSTVWX
elogiar/PQSTVX
embalsar/OPQRSTVWX
embolsar/OPQRSTVWX
embragar/PQSTVWX
empajar/PQSTVWX
emparedar/IOPQRSTVWX
emperifollar/OPQRSTVX
emprender/QTVX
enastilar/PQSTVWX
encapotar/IOPQRSTVWX
encarrillar/OPQRSTVWX
encolerizar/OPQRSTVWX
endemoniar/OPQRSTVX
enfilar/PQSTVWX
engrasar/HPQSTVWX
enmoquetar/PQSTVX
enresmar/PQSTVWX
ensalzar/IPQSTVWX
entenebrecer/QTWX
entontecer/OQRTWX
entrecortar/PQSTVX
entrevistar/OPQRSTVWX
enunciar/HPQSTVX
envinar/PQSTVWX
escaldar/OPQRSTVWX
escayolar/PQSTVX
escriturar/PQSTVWX
esnifar/PQSTVWX
espiar/OPQRSTWX
esquiar/PQSTWX
esterificar/HPQSTVWX
evaporizar/OPQRSTUVWX
exceptuar/HOPQRSTUWX
exiliar/OPQRSTVX
explorar/HOPQRSTUVX
extasiar/OPQRSTUWX
extraviar/OPQRSTUWX
farfullar/PQSTVWX
ferretear/PQSTVWX
fingir/INOQRTVWX
flexibilizar/OPQRSTVWX
fortalecer/IOQRTWX
frasear/OPQRSTUVWX
fundar/HOPQRSTUVX
garrochear/PQSTVWX
glasear/OPQRSTUVWX
graduar/HOPQRSTWX
guiar/OPQRSTWX
hacer/ILOQRTUWY
helenizar/HLOPQRSTVWX
hocicar/PQSTVWX
hormigonar/PQSTVX
humidificar/HPQSTVWX
idear/HPQSTVWX
impacientar/OPQRSTVX
importar/HLOPQRSTVX
incautar/HOPQRSTVWX
incubar/HOPQRSTVWX
indoctrinar/PQSTVWX
infectar/OPQRSTVWX
informatizar/HOPQRSTVWX
inhumar/HPQSTVWX
innovar/HPQSTVX
inspeccionar/PQSTVX
instruir/OQWY
interferir/QWY
interrogar/HLOPQRSTUVX
inutilizar/HPQSTVWX
involucrar/OPQRSTVWX
jabonar/OPQRSTVX
labrar/LPQSTVWX
largar/OPQRSTVWX
legrar/PQSTVWX
liderar/PQSTVWX
listar/PQSTVWX
lucrar/OPQRSTVWX
maleducar/PQSTVWX
malvender/QTVX
maniatar/PQSTVWX
maquillar/OPQRSTVWX
martirizar/OPQRSTVWX
mear/OPQRSTVWX
mentalizar/HOPQRSTVWX
mimeografiar/PQSTVX
mitigar/HPQSTVWX
momificar/HOPQRSTVWX
motear/PQSTVWX
musitar/PQSTVWX
nebulizar/PQSTVWX
normativizar/PQSTVWX
obliterar/HOPQRSTVWX
obviar/PQSTVX
ofuscar/HIOPQRSTVWX
opalizar/PQSTVWX
organizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
ostentar/HPQSTVX
paladear/OPQRSTVWX
paragonar/PQSTVX
parir/LQTVWX
pavimentar/HPQSTVX
pensar/ILOPQRSTUWX
perfumear/PQSTVWX
pertrechar/OPQRSTVWX
picar/LOPQRSTUVWX
pinzar/IPQSTVWX
plantear/IOPQRSTUVWX
policromar/PQSTVWX
posicionar/IOPQRSTUVX
precarizar/PQSTVWX
predisponer/OQRTWY
prendar/IOPQRSTVX
presionar/OPQRSTUVX
prever/QT
proclamar/HOPQRSTVWX
prohijar/HIPQSTWX
propalar/PQSTVWX
proseguir/IOQWY
puentear/PQSTVWX
quebrar/ILOPQRSTWX
rarificar/OPQRSTVWX
reabrir/OQRTVWY
realojar/PQSTVWX
rebasar/OPQRSTVWX
recauchutar/PQSTVWX
recitar/HPQSTVWX
reconfigurar/HOPQRSTUVWX
recopilar/HPQSTVWX
redactar/OPQRSTUVWX
reeditar/PQSTVWX
reenviar/PQSTWX
reforestar/HPQSTVX
regatear/PQSTVWX
rehusar/PQSTWX
relacionar/OPQRSTVX
rellenar/OPQRSTUVWX
remodelar/HOPQRSTUVX
renegar/PQSTWX
repasar/OPQRSTVWX
replegar/OPQRSTWX
represaliar/PQSTVX
repujar/PQSTVWX
resguardar/OPQRSTVWX
restar/LOPQRSTUVX
retomar/OPQRSTUVWX
reubicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
revestir/IOQWY
ribetear/PQSTVWX
roer/QWY
rugar/OPQRSTVWX
salar/PQSTVWX
saquear/IPQSTVWX
secundar/PQSTVX
segundar/PQSTVX
serrar/PQSTWX
simbolizar/HPQSTVWX
sintonizar/HPQSTVWX
sobredimensionar/PQSTVX
sobrentender/QTWX
sofaldar/PQSTVWX
solevantar/IPQSTVWX
sopesar/PQSTVX
subastar/HPQSTVWX
subsidiar/PQSTVX
succionar/PQSTVX
supeditar/HPQSTVWX
surtir/IOQRTVWX
sutilizar/PQSTVWX
tantear/PQSTVWX
tatuar/OPQRSTWX
televisar/PQSTVWX
tentar/HOPQRSTWX
tildar/PQSTVWX
tomar/OPQRSTUVWX
tortear/PQSTVWX
trajinar/LPQSTVWX
transfregar/PQSTWX
trasmutar/HOPQRSTVWX
trasudar/PQSTVWX
tresdoblar/PQSTVX
trivializar/HPQSTVWX
tutelar/PQSTVX
universalizar/HPQSTVWX
vadear/OPQRSTVWX
vapulear/IOPQRSTVWX
vender/OQRTUVX
vestir/OQWY
vilipendiar/PQSTVX
vitorear/PQSTVWX
vomitar/PQSTVWX
zahoriar/PQSTVX
zapatear/OPQRSTVWX
